Maine, session 132, LD1349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1304-B, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Contract to operate Juniper Ridge Landfill. The department may not enter into
or renew a contract for the operation of the state-owned Juniper Ridge Landfill, located in
the City of Old Town, without the approval of the Legislature.
Approval of a contract under this subsection does not replace any other license required by
law.